District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.41

License fees.

(a)

Annual fees to be paid through the Commissioner to the District of Columbia for licenses issued under this chapter shall include a $250 annual renewal fee for registration and certification for Risk Retention and Purchasing Groups and any other fee established pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

The Commissioner may promulgate rules to establish and amend all producer and license fees.

History

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1081, ch. 792, ch. II, § 41
Feb. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-52, § 6, 27 DCR 26
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 403(a), 41 DCR 2096
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 61(a), 43 DCR 530
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 29(c), 45 DCR 745
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-232, § 202(c), 54 DCR 368

Cross References

Refund of fees when license refused, see § 47-1318.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1545.
1973 Ed., § 35-1345.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-232 rewrote subsecs. (a) and (e), and repealed subsec. (b) to (d).

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.